Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-3509
Personal Internet account; employer; duty; liability.

(1) The Workplace Privacy Act does not create a duty for an employer to search or monitor the activity of a personal Internet account.

(2) An employer is not liable under the act for failure to request or require that an employee or applicant grant access to, allow observation of, or disclose information that allows access to or observation of the employee’s or applicant’s personal Internet account.

Laws 2016, LB821, § 9.